Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2449.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1 of the act of March 4, 1970 (P.L.128, No.49), entitled "An act granting to the Governor of the Commonwealth the sole authority for regulating the display of the flag of the United States from any public ground or building and from any ground or building of certain other institutions," is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 1. * * *(f) In addition to any other powers and duties imposed by this section, the Governor shall permit the voluntary display of the Green Star Service Banner on Commonwealth-owned or Commonwealth-controlled property during appropriate observances 12345678910111213141516171819 to honor and recognize the surviving families of members of the United States Armed Forces and veterans who died by suicide, consistent with applicable policies, procedures and security requirements governing the use of Commonwealth property.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2449PN3262 - 2 - 12345